Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.050

Baccalaureate and master's degree equivalency requirements for vocational instructors—Rules.

The Washington professional educator standards board shall develop and adopt rules establishing baccalaureate and master's degree equivalency standards for vocational instructors performing instructional duties and acquiring certification after August 31, 1992.

[ 2005 c 497 s 205; 1992 c 141 s 102; 1989 c 29 s 2; 1987 c 525 s 215. Formerly RCW 28A.70.042.]

NOTES:

Intent—Part headings not law—Effective date—2005 c 497: See notes following RCW 28A.305.011.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Intent—Short title—1987 c 525 ss 202-233: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Severability—1987 c 525: See note following RCW 28A.300.050.